Hawaii statutes.
§393-5 Excluded services.
"Employment" as defined in section 393-3 does not include:

(1) Service performed by an individual in the employ
of an employer who, by the laws of the United States, is responsible for care
and cost in connection with such service;

(2) Service performed by an individual in the employ
of [the] individual's spouse, son, or daughter, and service performed by an
individual under the age of twenty-one in the employ of the individual's father
or mother;

(3) Service performed in the employ of a voluntary
employee's beneficiary association providing for the payment of life, sick,
accident, or other benefits to the members of the association or their
dependents or their designated beneficiaries, if:

(A) Admission to membership in the
association is limited to individuals who are officers or employees of the
United States government; and

(B) No part of the net earnings of the
association inures (other than through such payments) to the benefits of any
private shareholder or individual;

(4) Service performed by an individual for an
employer as an insurance agent or as an insurance solicitor if all service
performed by the individual for the employer is performed for remuneration by
way of commission;

(5) Service performed by an individual for an
employer as a real estate salesperson or as a real estate broker if all service
performed by the individual for the employer is performed for remuneration by
way of commission;

(6) Service performed by an individual who, pursuant
to the federal Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, is not subject to the
provisions of law relating to federal employment, including unemployment
compensation;

(7) Domestic in-home and community-based services for
persons with developmental and intellectual disabilities under the medicaid
home and community-based services program pursuant to title 42 Code of Federal
Regulations sections 440.180 and 441.300, and title 42 Code of Federal
Regulations, part 434, subpart A, as amended, or when provided through state
funded medical assistance to individuals ineligible for medicaid, and
identified as chore, personal assistance and habilitation, residential
habilitation, supported employment, respite, and skilled nursing services, as
the terms are defined and amended from time to time by the department of human
services, performed by an individual whose services are contracted by a
recipient of social service payments and who voluntarily agrees in writing to
be an independent contractor of the recipient of social service payments; and

(8) Domestic services, which include attendant care,
and day care services authorized by the department of human services under the
Social Security Act, as amended, or when provided through state-funded medical
assistance to individuals ineligible for medicaid, when performed by an
individual in the employ of a recipient of social service payments. For the
purposes of this paragraph only, a "recipient of social service
payments" is a person who is an eligible recipient of social services such
as attendant care or day care services. [L 1974, c 210, pt of §1; am L 1978, c
110, §6; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L 1989, c 217, §2; gen ch 1993;
am L 2007, c 259, §9; am L 2011, c 220, §15; am L 2012, c 157, §3 and c 158, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next